Massachusetts, session 194th, H3294.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 3 of chapter 268B of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by striking out subsection (d) and inserting in place thereof the following
subsection:-
(d) make statements and reports filed with the commission available for public inspection
and copying during regular office hours at a charge not to exceed the actual administrative and
material costs required in reproducing said statements and reports. The commission shall provide
on a website read-only electronic copies of statements and reports filed with the commission;
provided, that the commission shall redact all personal information exempt from disclosure
pursuant to clause 26 of section 7 of chapter 4. The commission shall be authorized, in its
discretion, to exempt from public disclosure those portions of a statement of financial interest
of 2

filed pursuant to section 5, which contain the home address, personal email address and personal
and home telephone number of the filer and the name and home address of a family member of
the filer.

of 2